dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="i__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="om/en__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>enen</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inet</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enet</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bolst/er__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l>rar</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ren</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rarna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ern</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ret</l><r>er<s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ör__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>f</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>f</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ex__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="betjänte__n_pl">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="promovend__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="neri/um__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="halo__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="affidav/it__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>it</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>itet</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tet</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>it</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iten</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ten</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>it</l><r>it<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="okvantifierbarhet"><i>okvantifierbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fraktgods"><i>fraktgods</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hambo"><i>hambo</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="glimljus"><i>glimljus</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="väld"><i>väld</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="opanorerbarhet"><i>opanorerbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="agatglas"><i>agatglas</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="betjänte"><i>betjänte</i><par n="betjänte__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="odelbarhet"><i>odelbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pröjs"><i>pröjs</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sombrero"><i>sombrero</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="eteriserbarhet"><i>eteriserbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="margräs"><i>margräs</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mango"><i>mango</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ojoderbarhet"><i>ojoderbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="flams"><i>flams</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ointaglighet"><i>ointaglighet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bolster"><i>bolst</i><par n="bolst/er__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="mungo"><i>mungo</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="punsch"><i>punsch</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="brass"><i>brass</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bivackerbarhet"><i>bivackerbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pressglas"><i>pressglas</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="affidavit"><i>affidav</i><par n="affidav/it__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oelektriserbarhet"><i>oelektriserbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="consortes"><i>consortes</i><par n="betjänte__n_pl"/></e>
    <e lm="knaster"><i>knast</i><par n="bolst/er__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="kalkljus"><i>kalkljus</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oaptitlighet"><i>oaptitlighet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fandango"><i>fandango</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dås"><i>dås</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tjänstbarhet"><i>tjänstbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="omen"><i>om</i><par n="om/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="libero"><i>libero</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="omuljerbarhet"><i>omuljerbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="oralsex"><i>oralsex</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="viltsmak"><i>viltsmak</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="analsex"><i>analsex</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="geranium"><i>gerani</i><par n="neri/um__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="halo"><i>halo</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slafs"><i>slafs</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skummjölk"><i>skummjölk</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="korso"><i>korso</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="i__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="estetiserbarhet"><i>estetiserbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kiss"><i>kiss</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="frankerbarhet"><i>frankerbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="betalsex"><i>betalsex</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kaprifolium"><i>kaprifoli</i><par n="neri/um__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="opolitiserbarhet"><i>opolitiserbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="molo"><i>molo</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="boss"><i>boss</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="promovend"><i>promovend</i><par n="promovend__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="känguru"><i>känguru</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="flamenco"><i>flamenco</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="otillgänglighet"><i>otillgänglighet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="f"><i>f</i><par n="f__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vederlagsgods"><i>vederlagsgods</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jox"><i>jox</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lösgodis"><i>lösgodis</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ljuskopierbarhet"><i>ljuskopierbarhet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bolero"><i>bolero</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="slams"><i>slams</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="torero"><i>torero</i><par n="halo__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nerium"><i>neri</i><par n="neri/um__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="flussglas"><i>flussglas</i><par n="ex__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="viljelöshet"><i>viljelöshet</i><par n="ör__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="honoratiores"><i>honoratiores</i><par n="betjänte__n_pl"/></e>
